District of Columbia statutes.
3-1206.03

Collaboration.

(a)

Generally, advanced practice registered nurses shall carry out acts of advanced registered nursing in collaboration with a licensed health care provider.

(b)

Repealed.

(c)

Repealed.

(d)

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, hospitals, facilities, and agencies, in requiring specific levels of collaboration and licensed health care providers in agreeing to the levels of collaboration, shall apply reasonable, nondiscriminatory standards, free of anticompetitive intent or purpose, in accordance with Chapter 14 of Title 2, Chapter 45 of Title 28, ands § 44-507.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 603, 33 DCR 729
Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-247, § 2(r), 42 DCR 457

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-3306.3.